Utah statutes.
48-1d-501.   Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of property transferred to, services performed for, or other benefit provided to the partnership or an agreement to transfer property to, perform services for, or provide another benefit to the partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

